Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.015

Statement of availability. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

At the time of arraignment a person charged with a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense may be given a statement by the court that explains the availability, operation, and effects of the deferred prosecution program.

[ 2019 c 263 s 702; 1985 c 352 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 263 ss 202-803: See note following RCW 10.01.240.

Effective date—2019 c 263 ss 501-504, 601, 602, and 701-708: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.

PDFRCW 10.05.015

Statement of availability. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

At the time of arraignment a person charged with a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor domestic violence offense may be given a statement by the court that explains the availability, operation, and effects of the deferred prosecution.

[ 2024 c 306 s 12; 2019 c 263 s 702; 1985 c 352 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 306: See note following RCW 9.94A.661.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 263 ss 202-803: See note following RCW 10.01.240.

Effective date—2019 c 263 ss 501-504, 601, 602, and 701-708: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.